Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-707
Electric cooperative; use of term restricted.

The words electric cooperative shall not be used in the corporate name of corporations organized under the laws of this state, or authorized to do business herein, other than those organized pursuant to the provisions of sections 70-701 to 70-738.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 7, p. 205;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-807;

R.S.1943, § 70-707.